Montana, session 2025, HB597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-27-102, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-102. Who may petition and gather signatures. (1) (a) A petition may be signed only by a
qualified elector of the state of Montana.
(b) An inactive elector, as defined in 13-1-101, may not sign a petition.
(2) A person gathering signatures for a petition may not be paid anything of value based upon the
number of signatures gathered."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 597